Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3633
Nebraska Corn
Development, Utilization, and Marketing Fund; created; use; investment.

The Nebraska Corn Development, Utilization,
and Marketing Fund is created.
All fees collected pursuant to the Nebraska Corn Resources Act and any repayments
relating to the fund, including license fees or royalties, shall
be credited to the fund for the uses and
purposes of the act and
its enforcement. Such fund shall be expended solely for the administration
of the act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 33;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 19;

Laws 2012, LB1057, § 4.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.